Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB982.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1317 and 1520 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1317. Acknowledgment of littering provisions.On every vehicle registration card, the following statement shall be printed immediately above or below the signature of the applicant:[I hereby acknowledge this day that I have received notice of the provisions of section 3709 of the Vehicle Code.Also printed on the registration card shall be the following:Section 3709 provides for a fine of up to $300 for dropping, throwing or depositing, upon any highway, or 12345678910111213141516171819 upon any other public or private property without the consent of the owner thereof or into or on the waters of this Commonwealth from a vehicle, any waste paper, sweepings, ashes, household waste, glass, metal, refuse or rubbish or any dangerous or detrimental substance, or permitting any of the preceding without immediately removing such items or causing their removal.For any violation of section 3709, I may be subject to a fine of up to $300 upon conviction, including any violation resulting from the conduct of any other persons operating, in possession of or present within this vehicle with my permission, if I do not with reasonable certainty identify the driver of the vehicle at the time the violation occurred.]I hereby acknowledge that littering from a vehicle, including littering by any person operating or inside the vehicle with my permission, onto any highway, public or private property or waters in Pennsylvania is illegal under section 3709 of the Vehicle Code, and that I may, upon conviction of a violation, be fined up to $300 or sentenced to litter pick-up community service or both.§ 1520. Acknowledgment of littering provisions.On every application for a learner's permit or driver's license, the following statement shall be printed immediately above or below the signature of the applicant:[I hereby acknowledge this day that I have received notice of the provisions of section 3709 of the Vehicle Code.Also printed on the card shall be the following:Section 3709 provides for a fine of up to $300 for 20250HB0982PN1072 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dropping, throwing or depositing, upon any highway, or upon any other public or private property without the consent of the owner thereof or into or on the waters of this Commonwealth from a vehicle, any waste paper, sweepings, ashes, household waste, glass, metal, refuse or rubbish or any dangerous or detrimental substance, or permitting any of the preceding without immediately removing such items or causing their removal.For any violation of section 3709, I may be subject to a fine of up to $300 upon conviction, including any violation resulting from the conduct of any other persons present within any vehicle of which I am the driver.]I hereby acknowledge that littering from a vehicle, including littering by any passenger inside my vehicle, onto any highway, public or private property or waters in Pennsylvania is illegal under section 3709 of the Vehicle Code, and that I may, upon conviction of a violation, be fined up to $300 or sentenced to litter pick-up community service or both.Section 2. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0982PN1072 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920